Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 6. PRODUCTION, PROCESSING, AND SALE OF ANIMAL PRODUCTS

SUBTITLE C. CONTROL OF ANIMAL DISEASES AND PESTS

CHAPTER 167. TICK ERADICATION

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 167.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Animal" means any domestic, free-range, or wild animal capable of hosting or transporting ticks capable of carrying Babesia, including:

(A) livestock;

(B) zebras, bison, and giraffes; and

(C) deer, elk, and other cervid species.

(1-a) "Commission" means the Texas Animal Health Commission.

(2) "Enclosure" includes a pasture, pen, or lot.

(3) "Inspector" means an inspector of the commission, including a local inspector, a county or district supervising inspector, and the chief inspector.

(4) "Livestock" means cattle, horses, mules, jacks, or jennets.

(5) "Peace officer" includes a sheriff, constable, or other peace officer authorized to perform services in the county in which services are required.

(6) "Tick" means any tick capable of carrying Babesia, otherwise known as "fever."

(7) "Exotic livestock" has the meaning assigned by Section 161.001(a)(3) of this code.

(8) "Treatment" means a procedure or management practice used on an animal to prevent the infestation of, control, or eradicate ticks capable of carrying Babesia.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1436, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 637, Sec. 7, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 53, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.002. CARETAKER OF ANIMAL. A person is subject to this chapter as the caretaker of an animal if the person:

(1) is the owner, part owner, lessee, occupant, or caretaker of land or premises, and controls that land or those premises, on which the animal is located;

(2) is the parent of a minor child who owns an interest in the animal, unless a person other than the parent is the legal guardian of the minor child's estate; or

(3) is the administrator, executor, or guardian of an estate that owns the animal, or owns land on which the animal is located, and controls the estate by reason of the administration or guardianship.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1436, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 167.003. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES OF COMMISSION. (a) In accordance with this chapter, the commission shall eradicate all ticks capable of carrying Babesia in this state and shall protect all land, premises, and animals in this state from those ticks and exposure to those ticks.

(b) In carrying out this chapter, the commission may:

(1) adopt necessary rules;

(2) employ necessary personnel, including a chief inspector, chief clerk, stenographers, and clerks, and assign the personnel to perform duties authorized by this chapter or incidental to its enforcement;

(3) assist and cooperate with county officials; and

(4) enter into cooperative agreements with other state agencies or agencies of the federal government.

(c) The commission by rule may provide for the manner and method of treating saddle stock and stock used for gentle work and for the handling and certifying of that stock for movement, but unless the commission so provides, the stock is subject to this chapter as other animals.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1436, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.004. CLASSIFICATION OF ANIMALS OR PREMISES AS INFESTED, EXPOSED, OR FREE FROM EXPOSURE. (a) If a tick is found on an animal, the following are classified as tick infested:

(1) each animal that is in the same herd or is then or thereafter on the same range or in the same enclosure as the animal on which the tick is found; and

(2) the range or enclosure in or on which the animal is located.

(b) The commission by rule shall define what animals and premises are to be classified as exposed to ticks. The commission shall classify as exposed to ticks animals that have been on land or in an enclosure that the commission determines to be tick infested or exposed to ticks or to have been tick infested or exposed to ticks before or after the removal of the animals, unless the commission determines that the infestation or exposure occurred after the animals were removed and that the animals did not become infested or exposed before removal.

(c) Animals, land, and premises classified as tick infested or exposed to ticks retain that classification until the classification is changed by the commission in accordance with this chapter.

(d) Animals, land, and premises in the tick eradication area may not be considered to be free from exposure to ticks unless:

(1) the commission has officially classified the animals or premises as free from exposure and filed a copy of the order making that classification in the office of the supervising inspector of the county in which the animals or premises are located; or

(2) the supervising inspector of the county in which the animals or premises are located, under the authority of the commission, has classified the animals or premises in writing as free from exposure and filed the written classification in the supervising inspector's office.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1437, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.005. ERADICATION, FREE, AND INACTIVE QUARANTINE AREAS. (a) The tick eradication area is composed of counties and parts of counties designated for tick eradication under Section 167.006 of this code.

(b) The free area and the inactive quarantine area are composed of counties and parts of counties designated by the commission to be part of the applicable area.

(c) The commission may transfer a county or part of a county from the tick eradication area, the free area, or the inactive quarantine area to another type of area as the commission considers advisable or necessary.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1437, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 167.006. DESIGNATION OF TICK ERADICATION AREA. (a) The commission may designate for tick eradication any county or part of a county that the commission determines may contain ticks.

(b) The commission shall give notice that a county or part of a county is designated for tick eradication by:

(1) publishing a brief notice of the designation in a newspaper published in that county or that part of the county, as applicable; or

(2) posting a brief notice of the designation at the courthouse door of the county.

(c) The notice must prescribe a date on which the designation is to take effect and must be published or posted before the 10th day preceding that date. The county affected by the designation shall pay the expenses of giving notice.

(d) The designation of a county or part of a county for tick eradication takes effect on:

(1) the date specified in the notice, if the notice is published or posted within the time prescribed by Subsection (c) of this section; or

(2) the 10th day following the day on which notice is published or posted, if the notice is not published or posted within the time prescribed by that subsection.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1437, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 167.007. TICK ERADICATION IN FREE AREA. (a) The commission may conduct tick eradication in the free area and may establish quarantines and require the treatment of animals in the free area as provided by this chapter. The commission shall designate in writing the land or premises in the free area in which tick eradication is to be conducted.

(b) An owner or caretaker of animals in the free area and the commissioners court of a county all or part of which is located in the free area shall cooperate with the commission in the manner provided by this chapter for tick eradication in the tick eradication area.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1438, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.008. INSPECTIONS. The commission may order the owner, part owner, or caretaker of animals to gather the animals for inspection at a time and place prescribed in the order of the commission. The commission shall serve written notice of the order not later than the 12th day before the day of inspection. A person on whom an order is served is entitled to request and obtain a hearing in the manner provided by this chapter for hearings on orders to treat animals.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1438, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER B. QUARANTINES; REGULATION OF MOVEMENT OF ANIMALS AND COMMODITIES

Sec. 167.021. GENERAL QUARANTINE POWER. (a) The commission may establish quarantines on land, premises, and animals as necessary for tick eradication.

(b) The commission in writing may release a quarantine established under this chapter if the commission considers it necessary or advisable to do so.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1438, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.022. QUARANTINE OF TICK ERADICATION AREA. (a) The order designating a county or part of a county for tick eradication shall contain a provision quarantining that county or part of a county.

(b) A quarantine under this section has the effect of quarantining all land, premises, and animals in the area quarantined, regardless of whether any person's land, premises, or animals are specifically described in the quarantine order.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1438, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.023. QUARANTINE OF FREE AREA. (a) The commission by written order may establish a quarantine in the free area if necessary for the purpose of regulating the handling of animals and eradicating ticks or exposure to ticks in the free area or for the purpose of preventing the spread of tick infestation into the free area.

(b) The order of the commission establishing a quarantine in the free area shall designate the land or premises to be quarantined.

(c) The commission shall give notice of a quarantine established in the free area by:

(1) delivering notice to each owner or caretaker of animals in the area to be quarantined or to each owner or caretaker of land or premises in the area on which animals are located;

(2) posting written notice at the courthouse door of each county in which the area to be quarantined is located; or

(3) publishing notice in a newspaper published in each county in which the area to be quarantined is located.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1438, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.024. MOVEMENT IN OR FROM QUARANTINED AREA. (a) Unless a person first obtains a permit or a certificate from an authorized inspector, the person may not move animals in a quarantined area:

(1) from land owned, leased, or occupied by one person into or through any other land owned, leased, or occupied by another person; or

(2) onto any open range, public street, public road, or thoroughfare.

(b) Unless the person first obtains a permit or a certificate from an authorized inspector, the owner or caretaker of animals in a quarantined area may not move the animals, or permit the animals to be moved, from an enclosure owned, leased, or occupied by that person, from any open range, street, road, or thoroughfare, or from any land that the person does not own or control, into any other enclosure or other land owned, cared for, or controlled by that person, if:

(1) the animals are subject to treatment under this chapter and the land or enclosure to which the animals are moved:

(A) is classified in the records of the county supervising inspector as being free from ticks; or

(B) has been released from quarantine by the commission; or

(2) the animals are subject to treatment but are not being treated under this chapter in the conduct of regular systematic tick eradication by the commission and the land or enclosure to which the animals are moved is owned or controlled by that person and:

(A) tick eradication work is being conducted there; or

(B) the land or enclosure is vacated under the direction of the commission for the purpose of tick eradication.

(c) The owner or caretaker of animals located in a quarantined area may move animals, or permit animals to be moved, to and from treatment facilities for the purpose of treating the animals on a regular treatment date at the treatment facility to which the animals are to be moved or on another date designated by the inspector in charge of the treatment facility. The movement of animals under this subsection must be in accordance with the rules of the commission. Any other movement is considered to be in violation of the quarantine.

(d) In this section, "other land" means land that is separated from the land from which movement is made by a fence, dividing line, or the land of another person.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1439, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.025. MOVEMENT IN OR FROM INACTIVE QUARANTINED AREA. A person may not move animals or permit animals to be moved from or within the inactive quarantined area except in accordance with the rules of the commission.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1440, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.026. MOVEMENT INTO THIS STATE FROM QUARANTINED AREA. (a) A person may not move animals, or permit animals of which the person is the owner, part owner, or caretaker to be moved, into this state from an area in another state, territory, or country that is under state or federal quarantine for tick infestation or exposure unless the animals are accompanied by a certificate from an inspector of the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, United States Department of Agriculture.

(b) A person may not move goats, hogs, sheep, exotic livestock, or circus animals into this state from an area of another state, territory, or country that is under state or federal quarantine for tick infestation unless the animals:

(1) have been treated free from infestation or exposure; and

(2) are certified as having been so treated by an inspector of the commission or of the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, United States Department of Agriculture.

(c) A person may not move hay, straw, grass, packing straw, pine straw, corn shucks, weeds, plants, litter, manure, dirt, posts, sand, gravel, caliche, or animal by-products into this state for any purpose from an area of another state, territory, or country that is under state or federal quarantine for tick infestation unless the articles:

(1) have been treated in accordance with the requirements of the commission or the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, United States Department of Agriculture; and

(2) are certified as having been so treated by an inspector of the commission or the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, United States Department of Agriculture.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1440, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.027. PERMIT OR CERTIFICATE TO ACCOMPANY MOVEMENT. (a) A certificate or permit required for movement of animals within or into this state must be in the possession of the person in charge of the movement or the conveyance from the point of origin to the point of destination. If the movement is by a transportation company, including a railway or express company, the certificate must be attached to the shipping papers accompanying the movement from the point of origin to the point of destination. On demand of an inspector, the person in charge of the movement or conveyance shall exhibit the certificate or permit.

(b) A certificate required for movement of articles listed in Section 167.026(c) must accompany the movement to the final destination in this state or so long as the articles are moving through this state.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1440, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 55, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.028. STATEMENT OF POSSESSION AND DESTINATION. On request of an inspector, the owner, part owner, or caretaker, or a person accompanying and connected with a shipment, of animals that are being moved in this state or have been moved in this state within 60 days preceding the request, shall make a written statement of:

(1) the name of the owner or the person controlling the land from which the shipment originated and the county in which that land is located;

(2) the county and the particular place in that county to which the shipment is or was destined;

(3) the name and address of the person from whom the animals were obtained, if the animals were obtained in the 30 days preceding the request, or, if the animals were not obtained during the 30 days preceding the request, a statement of that fact; and

(4) the territory through which the shipment passed since leaving the point of origin and through which the shipment is intended to pass before reaching the point of destination.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1440, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.029. CONDITIONS, MANNER, AND METHOD OF MOVING AND HANDLING. (a) The commission by rule shall provide the conditions for and the manner and method of handling and moving animals:

(1) into, in, and from the tick eradication area;

(2) into, in, and from quarantined land or premises in the free area;

(3) into the released part of the free area; and

(4) into, in, and from the inactive quarantined area.

(b) Animals must be certified as being free from ticks and exposure to ticks, and must be moved to the destination without exposure, if the animals are to be moved:

(1) into the free area;

(2) from one county to another in the tick eradication area; or

(3) within a county to land or premises that are classified by the official records of the supervising inspector of the county as being free from ticks and exposure to ticks.

(c) The commission may adopt rules relating to testing, immunizing, treating, certifying, or marking or branding animals moving into this state from another state or country.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1441, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.030. DISINFECTION OF CONVEYANCE. (a) A person, including a railway or transportation company, who operates a conveyance into which animals are loaded shall clean and disinfect each car or other conveyance after removal of the animals unless the animals are clean and free from ticks or exposure to ticks.

(b) The commission shall adopt rules relating to the cleaning and disinfecting of conveyances.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1441, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.031. USE OF SAND AS BEDDING IN CONVEYANCE. The commission may establish quarantines and restrict the use of sand as bedding in an animal conveyance except for sand from known tick-free sand pits.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1441, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.032. MOVEMENT OF COMMODITIES. The commission may establish quarantines and restrict the movement from quarantined areas of hay, hides, carcasses, or other commodities that are capable of carrying ticks.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1441, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 167.033. HANDLING AND REMOVAL OF REFUSE OR DEAD OR INJURED ANIMALS. The commission may establish quarantines and regulate the removal and handling of refuse matter from quarantined stockyards, quarantined stock pens, and other quarantined places and may establish quarantines and regulate the handling or removal of animals that die or are injured in transit.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1442, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER C. TREATMENT

Sec. 167.051. ANIMALS SUBJECT TO TREATMENT. (a) Animals located in the tick eradication area are subject to treatment if the animals:

(1) are infested with ticks;

(2) were exposed to ticks within the nine months preceding an order to treat; or

(3) are on premises described in an order to treat during the time that the order is in effect and the person to whom the order is issued is the owner, part owner, or caretaker of the animals.

(b) Animals located in the free area are subject to treatment if:

(1) the animals are infested with ticks;

(2) the animals were exposed to ticks within the nine months preceding an order to treat;

(3) the animals are on premises described in an order to treat during the time the order is in effect and the person to whom the order is issued is the owner, part owner, or caretaker of the animals; or

(4) the commission determines that treatment is necessary to ensure that the animals are entirely free from infestation.

(c) The commission may require the treatment of animals that are located in the free area and are tick infested or have been exposed to ticks regardless of whether the animals or the area in which the animals are located is under quarantine.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1442, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.052. ORDER TO TREAT. (a) The commission may order the owner, part owner, or caretaker of animals to treat the animals in accordance with the directions of the commission. The order must be dated, in writing, and signed or stamped with the signature of the commission or the presiding officer of the commission.

(b) An order to treat must:

(1) state the period of time covered by the order;

(2) describe the premises on which the animals to be treated are located;

(3) state that the person to whom the order is directed shall treat all animals of which the person is the owner, part owner, or caretaker and which are located on those premises during that time;

(4) state that the treatment must be done under the supervision of an inspector;

(5) designate the method by which the animals are to be treated;

(6) state the dates on which the animals are to be treated; and

(7) state that if the person does not treat the animals on those dates, the treatment will be done at the person's expense by a peace officer acting in accordance with this chapter.

(c) The order is not required to describe the premises on which the animals are located by field notes or metes and bounds, but must provide a reasonable description sufficient to inform the person to whom it is directed of the premises or land covered by the order.

(d) An order may require the treatment of the animals on as many dates as the commission considers necessary for eradicating the infestation or exposure of the animals or the premises on which the animals are located.

(e) An order to treat must be delivered to the person to whom it is directed not later than the 12th day before the date specified in the order for the first treatment, not including the date of delivery or the date of the first treatment.

(f) A person to whom an order to treat is directed shall comply with the order and treat the animals in accordance with the directions of the commission. If the order is not delivered within the time provided by Subsection (e), the person receiving the order shall begin treatment on the first treatment date that is more than 12 days after the date of receipt of the order and shall continue treatment on subsequent dates as specified in the order.

(g) If the animals or the premises are not freed from ticks or exposure to ticks before an order to treat expires, the commission may issue additional orders regardless of whether the animals were exposed to ticks in the nine months preceding the date of the subsequent order.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1442, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 32, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.053. HEARING. (a) A person is entitled to request and obtain a hearing for the purpose of protesting an order to treat by filing a sworn application with the supervising inspector of the county in which the animals are located. The application must be filed not later than the 10th day after the day on which the order was received.

(b) Following a hearing, the commission shall transmit its written decision to the supervising inspector, who shall transmit it to the protesting person by delivering it in person or by mailing it by registered mail to the address shown in the hearing application. If the commission overrules the protest, the person to whom the order was directed shall comply with the order.

(c) If the commission's decision is delivered in person, a person whose protest is overruled shall begin treatment of the animals on the first treatment date in the order that is more than two days after the day on which the decision is received. If the decision is delivered by mail, the person shall begin treatment on the first treatment date in the order that is more than four days after the day on which the decision was deposited in the mail.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1443, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.054. EXCUSE FROM COMPLIANCE WITH ORDER. The supervising inspector of a county for good cause may excuse a person from complying with an order to treat, but shall be held responsible for excusing compliance without good cause.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1443, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.055. PERSONS RESPONSIBLE FOR TREATMENT AND ASSISTANCE. (a) A person who owns any interest in animals subject to treatment or who is the caretaker of the animals is responsible for the treatment of the animals under this chapter and is subject to prosecution for failure to treat the animals.

(b) A husband and wife are jointly and severally liable for the treatment of animals subject to treatment that belong to their community estate. Each spouse is responsible for the treatment of animals belonging to that person's separate estate, except that a spouse who is the caretaker of animals owned by the other spouse is responsible for the treatment of the animals.

(c) A person responsible for the treatment of animals subject to treatment shall furnish all necessary labor, at the person's own expense, for gathering the animals, driving the animals to the treatment facility, treating the animals, and returning the animals to the person's premises after treatment.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1443, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.056. MANNER OF TREATMENT. If the commission requires animals to be treated, the animals shall be treated in the manner prescribed by the commission.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1444, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.057. TREATMENT CHEMICALS. (a) The commission shall prescribe by rule the official materials in which animals are to be treated under this chapter. A person may not treat animals for purposes of this chapter in a material other than an official material prescribed by the commission.

(b) The state, an agency of the state, or an agency of the government of the United States shall, and a county may, furnish the official materials for the treatment of animals under this chapter.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1444, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.059. TREATMENT FACILITIES. (a) The commissioners court of each county, including a county in the free area, in all or part of which the commission conducts tick eradication shall cooperate with the commission and shall furnish facilities necessary to the treatment of animals in that county. The commissioners court shall furnish dipping vats, pens, chutes, and other necessary facilities in the number, at the locations, and of the type specified by the commission. In addition, the county, at its expense, shall maintain the facilities and repair or remodel them as necessary, shall provide the water for filling the vats, and shall clean and refill the vats as necessary.

(b) For the purpose of constructing, purchasing, or leasing treatment facilities, and for the purpose of providing necessary land, labor, or materials, a commissioners court may appropriate money out of the general fund of the county or may incur indebtedness by the issuance of warrants. A warrant issued may not draw interest at a rate of more than six percent per year and may not have a term of more than 20 years. The commissioners court may levy taxes to pay interest on warrants and may establish a sinking fund for the payment of warrants.

(c) For the purpose of acquiring necessary land for the construction or maintenance of treatment facilities, for the purpose of acquiring treatment facilities that have already been constructed, or for the purpose of acquiring land necessary for ingress and egress to and from those facilities, a commissioners court has the power of eminent domain. The commissioners court shall exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by law for acquiring land for the building and maintenance of public buildings, except that the court shall institute and prosecute condemnation proceedings on written request from the presiding officer of the commission. The request from the commission shall designate:

(1) the land to be condemned and its location;

(2) the name of the owner of the land to be condemned; and

(3) the easement to be acquired for ingress and egress.

(d) In acquiring land or facilities by eminent domain, the commissioners court may retain the property for permanent use by making appropriate compensation or may acquire the property for temporary use by making proper compensation for the period of time determined necessary by the commissioners court.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1444, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 33, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.060. TREATMENT REQUIRED FOR MOVEMENT FROM QUARANTINED AREA. (a) An inspector may not issue a certificate or permit for the movement of animals from a quarantined enclosure unless the owner or caretaker of the animals:

(1) is cooperating with the commission in the regular systematic treatment of the animals listed in Subsection (b); and

(2) has treated those animals on the last two treatment dates that were prescribed for the area in which the animals are located and that preceded the date of movement.

(b) In order to be issued the permit or certificate, the owner or caretaker must cooperate with the commission in the regular systematic treatment of animals of which the person is the owner or caretaker and which:

(1) are located in the enclosure from which the animals are to be moved;

(2) are located in quarantined enclosures that connect with the enclosure from which the animals are to be moved, including an enclosure that:

(A) connects with an enclosure that connects with the enclosure from which the animals are to be moved; or

(B) is on the opposite side of a lane or road from the enclosure from which the animals are to be moved; or

(3) are located on the quarantined open range that connects with any of the enclosures under Subdivision (1) or (2).

(c) If ticks are found on any of the animals submitted for movement, before the certificate or permit is issued, each head of the animals must be treated as prescribed by commission rules.

(d) The commission may waive the enforcement of this section for good cause. A waiver of the commission must be in writing.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1445, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER D. STOCKYARD REGULATION

Sec. 167.081. DESIGNATION OF FACILITY TO HANDLE CERTIFIED LIVESTOCK. (a) The commission may designate a stockyard that is in the tick eradication area or in the free area and is open to the public for yarding, marketing, and selling livestock as a facility to handle intrastate movements of livestock certified by an inspector to be free from ticks or exposure to ticks. A stockyard so designated shall provide tick-free facilities for the handling of that livestock in accordance with this subchapter.

(b) A designation under this section is effective for 24 months following the day on which notice is served, and the commission may redesignate a facility for the purpose of this section.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1445, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 167.082. NOTICE AND HEARING. (a) The commission shall give written notice of a designation under this subchapter to the stockyard company or to the owner, operator, or other person in control of the stockyard.

(b) A person to whom a notice is directed may request a hearing for the purpose of protesting the designation in the manner provided by Section 167.053 for requesting a hearing on an order to treat. The commission shall grant the hearing and give notice of its decision in the manner provided by that section.

(c) A person whose protest is overruled shall complete the work required to provide tick-free facilities not later than the 60th day following the day on which the person receives notice of the commission's decision.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1446, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.083. MAINTENANCE OF TICK-FREE FACILITIES. (a) A person who owns or operates and is in control of a stockyard designated under this subchapter shall maintain clean and tick-free facilities, including pens, alleys, and chutes, so that livestock certified by an inspector to be free from ticks or exposure to ticks may be received, yarded, weighed, and sold for intrastate purposes without being subject to exposure to ticks.

(b) In accordance with Subsection (a) of this section, the owner or operator shall maintain tick-free scales, entrances, exits, pens, and territory immediately surrounding the pens.

(c) The stockyard company, owner or operator, or other person in control of a stockyard may not discriminate between interstate and intrastate handling of livestock.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1446, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

SUBCHAPTER E. ENFORCEMENT

Sec. 167.101. INSPECTORS. (a) The commissioners court of a county in which the commission conducts tick eradication may nominate the number of local inspectors found by the commission to be necessary for tick eradication in that county. The commission shall appoint those persons nominated unless, following appointment of local inspectors, the commission finds that the county is trying to retard tick eradication or is nominating persons who are incompetent or negligent in the performance of duty. In that case, the commission may ignore the nominations of the county.

(b) If a commissioners court fails or refuses to nominate persons as local inspectors, the commission shall appoint local inspectors without nomination.

(c) Local inspectors work under the direction and orders of the commission and are subject to discharge by the commission. The commission shall fix and the state shall pay the salaries of local inspectors, but a county may pay the salary and traveling expenses of a local inspector.

(d) The commission may employ county and district supervising inspectors without nomination by the commissioners courts.

(e) Only an inspector appointed for the purpose may conduct tick eradication or issue permits and certificates certifying animals to be free from ticks or exposure to ticks. An inspector shall issue those permits and certificates in accordance with the rules of the commission.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1446, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.102. ENTRY POWER. (a) A commissioner or an inspector, and assistants, may enter public or private property, without a warrant, for the exercise of an authority or performance of a duty under this chapter.

(b) If an inspector or commissioner desires to be accompanied by a peace officer, the inspector or commissioner shall apply for a search warrant to a magistrate of the county in which the property is located. The magistrate shall issue the search warrant on a showing of probable cause by oath or affirmation.

(c) The search warrant shall describe the place to be entered in a reasonable manner that will enable the person in charge of the property to identify the property described, but the warrant is not required to describe the property by field notes or by metes and bounds. If the applicant for the warrant seeks to enter the property to determine whether animals are on the property, the application for the warrant shall state that. If the warrant is obtained for the purpose of seizing or treating animals, the application and the warrant shall describe the animals and give the approximate number of animals. If any of that information is unknown to the applicant, the application and warrant shall state that the information is unknown.

(d) A search warrant issued under this section authorizes the person to whom it is issued to enter the property for the exercise of an authority or performance of a duty under this chapter and to be accompanied by a peace officer and assistants. In addition, the warrant authorizes the peace officer and the assistants to perform any duty authorized by this chapter.

(e) A search warrant issued under this section permits entry and reentry for the purposes of this section for a period of 60 days beginning on the day on which it is issued. After that period, additional search warrants may be issued as often as necessary.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1447, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.103. TREATMENT OF ANIMALS BY PEACE OFFICER ON REQUEST OF INSPECTOR. (a) If a person responsible for treating animals fails to treat the animals at the time and place directed in the order or, prior to a treatment date in the order, states that he or she does not intend to treat the animals, the inspector in charge of tick eradication in that county shall notify a peace officer.

(b) The peace officer shall deputize a sufficient number of assistants, to be designated by the supervising inspector of the county, shall enter the property on which the animals are located, and shall gather and treat the animals under the supervision of an inspector and in accordance with the directions of the commission.

(c) The peace officer shall continue to treat the animals on each treatment date specified in the order until the person responsible for treatment begins and continues the treatment in accordance with that order.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1447, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.104. SEIZURE AND DISPOSAL OF ANIMALS RUNNING AT LARGE. (a) An inspector may request a peace officer to seize animals if:

(1) the inspector determines the animals to be running at large or on the open range of a county or part of a county in which the commission is conducting tick eradication under this chapter; and

(2) the inspector is unable to locate the owner or caretaker of the animals.

(b) The peace officer may deputize assistants, shall seize the animals, and shall treat the animals under the supervision of an inspector. The officer shall impound the animals at a place designated by the inspector or otherwise dispose of the animals as necessary for the purpose of tick eradication.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1448, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.105. SEIZURE AND DISPOSAL OF ANIMALS MOVED IN VIOLATION OF QUARANTINE. (a) An inspector who discovers animals that are being or have been moved in violation of a quarantine may request a peace officer to seize the animals and:

(1) impound the animals at the expense of the owner; or

(2) if practicable, return the animals at the expense of the owner to the point of origin.

(b) In addition to other expenses, the owner of the seized animals shall pay the officer a fee of $2 and the cost of feeding, watering, and holding the animals.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1448, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.106. INJUNCTION; MANDAMUS. (a) The commission or a resident of this state may sue for an injunction to compel compliance with a provision of this chapter or to restrain a threatened violation of a provision of this chapter.

(b) A resident of this state may sue for mandamus against a commissioners court to compel the compliance of that court with the duty of the commissioners court under this chapter.

(c) The commission or a resident of a county or part of a county in which tick eradication is being conducted may sue for permanent or temporary relief to compel a person who is an owner, part owner, or caretaker of animals to treat the animals in accordance with this chapter if the person has failed or refused to treat the animals or has threatened to fail or refuse to treat the animals. If the court finds that the defendant has been served with an order of the commission to treat the animals, that the animals are subject to treatment, and that the material allegations of the plaintiff's petition are true, the court shall enter an order commanding the defendant to treat the animals in accordance with the directions of the commission at the time and place designated in the order of the commission or in the order of the court. If the defendant fails to comply with the order of the court, the court may hold the defendant in contempt and punish the defendant accordingly and shall order a peace officer to deputize assistants and treat the animals in accordance with the order of the court. The expense of treating the animals and employing the peace officer and assistants shall be taxed against the defendant as a cost of suit.

(d) A court may hear and determine a suit under this section in term or in vacation. Notice of the suit shall be given to the defendant as the court determines justice requires.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1448, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.107. SALE OF ANIMALS TREATED OR SEIZED BY PEACE OFFICER. (a) A peace officer who gathers and treats or who seizes and impounds or disposes of animals under Section 167.103, 167.104, or 167.105 is entitled to retain and sell the animals for the purpose of securing payment for the expenses of handling, including the expenses of holding, feeding, and watering the animals.

(b) Not later than the 60th day after the day on which animals are treated or seized, the peace officer may sell at public sale to the highest bidder a number of the animals sufficient to cover the secured expenses. The officer shall conduct the sale at the courthouse door of the county in which the animals are located and shall post notice of the sale at that courthouse door at least five days before the day of the sale.

(c) If any proceeds of the sale remain after deducting the amount to which the peace officer is entitled, the peace officer shall pay those proceeds to the county treasurer subject to the order of the owner of the animals.

(d) A peace officer who treats animals under Section 167.103 is entitled to act under this section to secure the expenses of each day on which the animals are treated.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1449, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 28, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 28, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.108. LIENS. (a) A peace officer who gathers and treats or who seizes and impounds or disposes of animals under Section 167.103, 167.104, or 167.105 has a lien on the animals for the purpose of securing payment of the officer's fees and the expenses of handling the animals, including the expenses of holding, feeding, and watering the animals and the expenses of paying assistants. Instead of retaining and selling the animals under Section 167.107, the officer may perfect and foreclose a lien granted by this section.

(b) A peace officer who treats animals in accordance with an order of a court under Section 167.106(c), and the peace officer's assistants, have a lien on the animals to secure payment of the expenses and costs of the treatment.

(c) A peace officer may perfect a lien under Subsection (a) by filing a sworn statement of indebtedness with the county clerk of the county in which the animals are located. The statement must describe the animals and must be filed within six months after the treatment or other action of the peace officer giving rise to the lien. The statement may cover a single action or actions over a period of time. If the statement covers actions over a period of time, the statement must be filed within six months after the last treatment or other action giving rise to the lien.

(d) A peace officer may perfect a lien under Subsection (b) by filing a sworn statement covering a single treatment or a number of treatments with the clerk of the district court. The statement must show the number of animals treated and must describe the animals. The statement must be filed within 12 months after each treatment.

(e) A peace officer may foreclose a lien under Subsection (a) by filing suit against the owner of the animals in a court of competent jurisdiction for collection of the account and foreclosure of the lien. The suit must be filed within 24 months after the statement is filed with the county clerk. In the suit, the court may not require a cost bond of the peace officer or any person to whom the peace officer has assigned the account. The court shall enter judgment for the debt, with interest and costs of suit, and for foreclosure of the lien on the number of animals that the court determines necessary to defray the expenses and fees secured.

(f) The court shall foreclose a lien under Subsection (b) of this section after the filing of the statement and shall do so against the number of animals necessary for the payment of the expenses and costs. The court shall order those animals sold as under execution.

(g) If a lien is foreclosed under this section, the remainder of the proceeds of the sale following deduction of expenses and costs shall be paid to the clerk of the court in which the suit is pending and are subject to the order of the owner of the animals.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1449, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 29, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 29, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.109. ADMISSIBILITY OF COMMISSION INSTRUMENTS; IDENTIFICATION IN COMPLAINT. (a) A copy of a written instrument issued by the commission is admissible as evidence in any court of this state if the copy is certified by the presiding officer of the commission.

(b) In a prosecution for a violation of this chapter, the state is not required to include in the complaint, information, or indictment a verbatim copy of a written instrument or proclamation, but may allege the issuance and identify it by date of issuance.

(c) In the trial of a civil or criminal case under this chapter, in which a certified copy of a commission written instrument or a proclamation is to be introduced in evidence, the instrument or proclamation is not required to be filed with the papers of the cause and the party introducing it is not required to give notice of it to the other party.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1450, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 34, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 167.110. PRESUMPTION OF EXISTENCE OR SUFFICIENCY OF TREATMENT. (a) In the trial of any case under this chapter in connection with the treatment of animals or the failure to treat animals, it is presumed that:

(1) the treatment contained a sufficient amount of treatment chemical and the treatment chemical had been properly tested; or

(2) the treatment chemical could have and would have been put into the treatment facility and tested if the owner or caretaker had brought the animals to the treatment facility for the purpose of treatment.

(b) In a criminal prosecution for failure to treat animals under this chapter, the state is not required to allege and prove that the treatment facility contained treatment chemical.

(c) If it is necessary in a court proceeding to prove the test of a treatment chemical, it is only necessary to prove that:

(1) the treatment chemical used was one of the official treatment chemicals prescribed by the commission; and

(2) the inspector tested the treatment chemical in accordance with the rules of the commission.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1450, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 30, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 30, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.111. PRESUMPTION OF OWNERSHIP OR CARE. (a) If an inspector determines that a person is the owner, part owner, or caretaker of animals subject to treatment and an order to treat is issued and served, it is presumed that, at the time of a failure to treat, the person was still the owner, part owner, or caretaker of animals subject to treatment located on the premises described in the order. In that case, the state is required to prove only that the person was the owner, part owner, or caretaker of animals subject to treatment located on the premises at the time the order was served.

(b) After the service of an order to treat, if there are no longer any animals subject to treatment located on the premises and if no animals subject to treatment have been illegally removed, the defendant may file a sworn statement of that fact at the beginning of the trial. If the defendant does not file that statement, it is presumed that the defendant's status as owner, part owner, or caretaker remained unchanged since the service of the order.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1451, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 30, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 30, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.112. VENUE OF CRIMINAL PROSECUTION. The owner, part owner, or caretaker of animals is subject to prosecution under this chapter in the county in which the animals and the premises are located, regardless of whether the defendant was in the county at the time of issuance and service of the order to treat, at the time of the failure to treat, or at the time of violation of the quarantine.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1451, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 30, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 30, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.113. CIVIL SUIT AGAINST CORPORATE OFFENDER. If a corporation or an agent of the corporation acting within the agent's scope of authority commits an offense under this chapter, the county attorney of the county in which the violation occurs shall institute a civil suit on behalf of the state in a court of competent jurisdiction for collection of the fine.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1451, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

SUBCHAPTER F. PENALTIES

Sec. 167.131. REFUSAL OF INSPECTION. (a) A person commits an offense if, as the owner, part owner, or caretaker of animals, the person fails to gather the animals for inspection at the time and place ordered by the commission under Section 167.008.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1451, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 56, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 548, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 31, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 31, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.132. MOVEMENT OF ANIMALS IN VIOLATION OF QUARANTINE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person moves, or as owner, part owner, or caretaker permits the movement of, animals from any land, premises, or enclosure that is under quarantine for tick infestation or exposure in violation of the quarantine without a permit issued by an inspector of the commission or of the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, United States Department of Agriculture.

(b) A railroad or other transportation company commits an offense if it permits an animal to enter stock pens in the tick eradication area under the company's control without a written certificate or permit from an inspector of the commission or of the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, United States Department of Agriculture.

(c) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor for each animal moved, permitted to move, or permitted to enter the pen unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

(d) Except as provided by this subsection, a person commits a separate offense under Subsection (a) for each county into which animals are moved within 30 days following the day on which the animals leave the county in which they were quarantined. A person does not commit an offense for a county if the person complied with the requirements of this chapter prior to entry into that county.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1451, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 57, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 548, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 32, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 32, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.133. MOVEMENT OF ANIMALS OR COMMODITIES INTO TEXAS FROM QUARANTINED AREA. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) moves animals or, as owner, part owner, or caretaker, permits animals to be moved into this state in violation of Section 167.026(a); or

(2) moves animals or commodities into this state in violation of Section 167.026(b) or (c).

(b) An offense under Subsection (a)(1) is a Class C misdemeanor for each animal moved or permitted to be moved unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

(c) An offense under Subsection (a)(2) of this section is a Class C misdemeanor unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor. A person commits a separate offense under that subsection for the movement of each animal, each animal product, or each shipment of another commodity.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1452, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 58, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 548, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 33, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 33, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.134. MOVEMENT OF ANIMALS IN VIOLATION OF PERMIT OR CERTIFICATE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person moves or, as owner, part owner, or caretaker, permits the movement of, animals under a certificate or permit from quarantined land, premises, or enclosures to a place other than that designated on the certificate or permit by the inspector.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor for each animal moved unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1452, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 59, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 548, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 34, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 34, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.135. FAILURE TO POSSESS OR EXHIBIT PERMIT OR CERTIFICATE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person is in charge of animals for which a certificate or permit is required or is in charge of the conveyance transporting that animal and the person fails to possess or exhibit the certificate or permit in the manner provided by Section 167.027.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor for each animal moved or conveyed without a certificate or permit as required by Subsection (a) unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1452, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 60, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 548, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 34, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 34, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.136. FAILURE TO MAKE STATEMENT OF POSSESSION AND DESTINATION; MAKING FALSE STATEMENT. (a) A person required by Section 167.028 of this code to make a written statement commits an offense if the person:

(1) fails or refuses to make the statement in accordance with that section; or

(2) makes a false statement under that section.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1452, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 61, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 548, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 167.137. FAILURE TO DISINFECT CONVEYANCE. (a) A person required by Section 167.030 of this code to clean and disinfect a conveyance commits an offense if the person fails or refuses to clean and disinfect the conveyance in accordance with the rules of the commission.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor for each car or other means of conveyance not cleaned and disinfected unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

(c) A person commits a separate offense for each day of failure or refusal.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1453, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 62, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 548, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 167.138. USE OF SAND AS BEDDING. (a) A person commits an offense if the person uses sand as bedding in an animal conveyance in violation of a quarantine established or a commission rule adopted under Section 167.031.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1453, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 63, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 548, Sec. 28, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 35, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 35, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.139. MOVEMENT OF COMMODITIES FROM QUARANTINED AREA. (a) A person commits an offense if the person moves a commodity capable of carrying ticks from a quarantined area in violation of a quarantine established or a commission rule adopted under Section 167.032 of this code.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1453, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 64, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 548, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 167.140. IMPROPER HANDLING AND REMOVAL OF ANIMAL REFUSE OR DEAD OR INJURED ANIMALS. (a) A person commits an offense if the person violates a quarantine established or a commission rule adopted under Section 167.033 of this code.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1453, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 65, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 548, Sec. 30, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 36, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 36, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.141. FAILURE TO TREAT ANIMALS. (a) A person who is the owner, part owner, or caretaker of animals commits an offense if, after the 12th day following the day on which notice of an order to treat is received, the person fails or refuses to treat the animals as prescribed in the order, on any date prescribed in the order, during the hours prescribed in the order, under the supervision of an inspector, with an official treatment chemical, or in the treatment facility designated in the order.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1453, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 66, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 548, Sec. 31, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 37, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 38, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 37, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 38, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.142. DESTRUCTION OF PUBLIC TREATMENT FACILITIES. (a) A person commits an offense if the person, without lawful authority:

(1) damages or destroys all or part of a dipping vat, pen, chute, or other facility provided under Section 167.059 of this code by use of any means, including cutting, burning, or tearing down or by use of dynamite or another explosive; or

(2) attempts to damage or destroy all or part of one of those facilities.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1453, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 67, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 548, Sec. 32, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (H.B. 1807), Sec. 39, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 39, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 167.143. FAILURE TO PROVIDE TICK-FREE STOCKYARD FACILITIES. (a) A stockyard company or an owner, operator, or person in charge of a stockyard commits an offense if the person fails or refuses to provide and complete facilities required by the commission under Subchapter D of this chapter within 60 days after the day on which notice of designation is served under that subchapter.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

(c) A person commits a separate offense for each 30 days of failure or refusal within the 24 months following service of notice.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1454, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 68, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 548, Sec. 33, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 167.144. REFUSAL TO PERMIT SEARCH. (a) A person commits an offense if the person refuses to permit a person to whom a search warrant is issued under Section 167.102 of this code, that person's assistant, or a peace officer, to enter the property described in the warrant or to perform a duty under this chapter.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

(c) A person commits a separate offense for each day of refusal.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1454, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 69, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.